Hawaii statutes.
§183-34 Use of lands and funds. No
land or interest therein acquired under this part shall be used for other than
forest reserve purposes, or purposes directly connected with water supply
development except as otherwise provided by act of the legislature, nor shall
any provision of this part be construed to authorize the expenditure of funds
herein appropriated for the acquisition of any water rights. [L 1949, c 274,
§6; RL 1955, §19-25; HRS §183-34]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next